Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20218-3010
Digital asset depository; compliance with state and federal laws; required.

A digital asset depository shall comply with all state and federal laws, including, but not limited to, those relating to anti-money laundering, customer identification, and beneficial ownership.

Laws 2021, LB649, § 10.